Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-623.01
County; designate
animal control authority.

Each county shall designate
an animal control authority that shall be responsible for enforcing sections
54-617 to 54-624 and the laws of such county regarding dangerous dogs.

Laws 2008, LB1055, § 22;

Laws 2009, LB494, § 12.